test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_U.gt-norm.yaml
     çu+V+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: tla çu tla
     çu+V+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla çuga tla
     çu+V+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla çu tla
     çu+V+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla çugáng tla
     çu+V+DIRECT+PAST: tla çugán tla
     çu+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla çuyáa tla
     çu+V+INDIRECT+PAST: tla çuyáan tla
     çu+V+RELATIVE: tla çus tla
     çu+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: tla çuyáas tla
     çu+V+NON_FACTIVE: tla çuáng tla
     çu+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: tla çuyáa.ang tla
     çu+V+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla çugáng tla
     çu+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla çugánggang tla
     çu+V+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: tla çugángang tla
     çu+V+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çugíinii tla
     çu+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çugáangaa tla
     çu+V+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çugáangaan tla
     çu+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: tla çuäsáa tla
     çu+V+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: tla çuäs tla
     çu+V+SIMPLE+FUTURE: tla çuäsáang tla
     çu+V+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: tla çuäsga tla
     çu+V+RELATIVE+FUTURE: tla çuäsáas tla
     çu+V+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: tla çuäsáa.ang tla
     çu+V+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: tla çuáng ñasa'áa tla
     çu+V+NEAR+FUTURE: tla çuáng ñasa'áang tla
     çu+V+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla çuáng ñasaasdláa tla
     çu+V+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla çuáng ñasaasdláang tla
     çu+V+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla çu'úuj tla
     çu+V+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla çu'úujang tla
     çu+V+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: tla çuäsáa'uujang tla
     çu+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: tla çu'us tla
     çu+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla çu'ujáa tla
     çu+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'úujaangaa tla
     çu+V+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: tla çuäsáa'us tla
     çu+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: tla çu'ahlánggang tla
     çu+V+CERTAIN+PAST: tla çu'ahlánggan tla
     çu+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'ahlánggiinii tla
     çu+V+CERTAIN+FUTURE: tla çuäsáa'ahlans tla
     çu+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: tla çu'ahláns tla
     çu+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: tla çuyáa'ahlang tla
     çu+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: tla çuyáa'ahlanggaa tla
     çu+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: tla çuyáa'ahlanggang tla
     çu+V+REFLEXIVE: tla çu'ahl tla
     çu+V+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: tla çuäséehl tla
     çu+V+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: tla çu'úu tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla çu'wáa tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla çu'wáa tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla çu'wáang tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: tla çu'wägán tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla çu'áawaa tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: tla çu'áawaan tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: tla çu'wáas tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: tla çu'áawaas tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: tla çu'wáa.ang tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: tla çu'áawaa.ang tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla çugáng'waa tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla çugáng'waang tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: tla çugáng'waa.ang tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'wägíinii tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'wägáangaa tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'wägáangaan tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: tla çu'wáaäsaa tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: tla çu'wáaäs tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: tla çu'wáaäsaang tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: tla çu'wáaäsga tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: tla çu'wáaäsaas tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: tla çu'wáaäsaa.ang tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: tla çu'wáa.ang ñasa'áa tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: tla çu'wáa.ang ñasa'áang tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla çu'wáa.ang ñasaasdláa tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla çu'wáa.ang ñasaasdláang tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla çu'wáa'uuj tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla çu'wáa'uujang tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: tla çu'wáaäsaa'uujang tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: tla çu'wáa'us tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla çu'wáa'ujaa tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'wáa'uujaangaa tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: tla çu'wáaäsaa'us tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: tla çu'wáa'ahlanggang tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: tla çu'wáa'ahlanggan tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'wáa'ahlanggiinii tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: tla çu'wáaäsaa'ahlans tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: tla çu'wáa'ahlans tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: tla çu'áawaa'ahlang tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: tla çu'áawaa'ahlanggaa tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: tla çu'áawaa'ahlanggang tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: tla çu'wáa'ahl tla
     çu+V+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: tla çu'wáaäseehl tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+SINGULAR+IMPERATIVE: tla çu'áng tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla çu'ángga tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla çu'áng tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla çu'ánggang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST: tla çu'ánggan tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla çu'áangaa tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST: tla çu'áangaan tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE: tla çu'áns tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: tla çu'áangaas tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+NON_FACTIVE: tla çu'ángang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: tla çu'áangaa.ang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla çu'ánggang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla çugáng'anggang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: tla çugáng'angang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'ánggiinii tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'ánggaangaa tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'ánggaangaan tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: tla çu'ángäsaa tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: tla çu'ángäs tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+SIMPLE+FUTURE: tla çu'ángäsaang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: tla çu'ángäsga tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+RELATIVE+FUTURE: tla çu'ángäsaas tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: tla çu'ángäsaa.ang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: tla çuáng ñasaa'áng tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: tla çuáng ñasaa'ánggang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla çuáng ñasaasdlä'áng tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla çuáng ñasaasdlä'ánggang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla çu'áng'uuj tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla çu'áng'uujang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: tla çu'ángäsaa'uujang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: tla çu'áng'us tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla çu'áng'ujaa tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'áng'uujaangaa tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: tla çu'ángäsaa'us tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PRESENT: tla çu'áang'ahlanggang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST: tla çu'áang'ahlanggan tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'áang'ahlanggiinii tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+FUTURE: tla çu'ángäsaa'ahlans tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: tla çu'áang'ahlans tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+INTENSIVE+PAST: tla çu'áangaa'ahlang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: tla çu'áangaa'ahlanggaa tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: tla çu'áangaa'ahlanggang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+REFLEXIVE: tla çu'áang'ahl tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: tla çu'ángäseehl tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+PLURAL+IMPERATIVE: tla çu'áng'uu tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla çu'áng'waa tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla çu'áng'waa tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla çu'áng'waang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST: tla çu'áng'wägan tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla çu'áng'aawaa tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST: tla çu'áng'aawaan tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE: tla çu'áng'waas tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: tla çu'áng'aawaas tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NON_FACTIVE: tla çu'áng'waa.ang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: tla çu'áng'aawaa.ang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla çugáng'ang'waa tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL: tla çugáng'ang'waang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+PRESENT+HABITUAL+NON_FACTIVE: tla çugáng'ang'waa.ang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+DIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'áng'wägiinii tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'áng'wägaangaa tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INDIRECT+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'áng'wägaangaan tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+LONG: tla çu'áng'waaäsaa tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE+SHORT: tla çu'áng'waaäs tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SIMPLE+FUTURE: tla çu'áng'waaäsaang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+IMMEDIATE+FUTURE: tla çu'áng'waaäsga tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RELATIVE+FUTURE: tla çu'áng'waaäsaas tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+NON_FACTIVE: tla çu'áng'waaäsaa.ang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+NEAR+FUTURE: tla çu'wáa.ang ñasaa'áng tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+NEAR+FUTURE: tla çu'wáa.ang ñasaa'ánggang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTERROGATIVE+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla çu'wáa.ang ñasaasdlä'áng tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+VERYNEAR+FUTURE: tla çu'wáa.ang ñasaasdlä'ánggang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+IMMEDIATE+PRESENT: tla çu'áng'waa'uuj tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+SIMPLE+PRESENT: tla çu'áng'waa'uujang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+RESIGNED_OBLIGATION: tla çu'áng'waaäsaa'uujang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PRESENT: tla çu'áng'waa'us tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: tla çu'áng'waa'ujaa tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'áng'waa'uujaangaa tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+BIASED+INTERROGATIVE+FUTURE: tla çu'áng'waaäsaa'us tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PRESENT: tla çu'áng'waa'ahlanggang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST: tla çu'áng'waa'ahlanggan tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: tla çu'áng'waa'ahlanggiinii tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+FUTURE: tla çu'áng'waaäsaa'ahlans tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: tla çu'áng'waa'ahlans tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+INTENSIVE+PAST: tla çu'áng'aawaa'ahlang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: tla çu'áng'aawaa'ahlanggaa tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: tla çu'áng'aawaa'ahlanggang tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+REFLEXIVE: tla çu'áng'waa'ahl tla
     çu+V+NEGATIVE+3rd_PERSON_PLURAL+FUTURE+REFLEXIVE+INTERROGATIVE: tla çu'áng'waaäseehl tla
